Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.265

Washington professional educator standards board—Certification—Cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards of practice.

(1) In establishing policies and requirements for the preparation and certification of educators under RCW 28A.410.210, the Washington professional educator standards board shall require that the programs of courses, requirements, and other activities leading to educator certification incorporate the cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards of practice developed under RCW 28A.410.260 and include the foundational elements of cultural competence, focusing on multicultural education and principles of English language acquisition, including information regarding best practices to implement the tribal history and culture curriculum.

(2) For purposes of this section, "cultural competency," "diversity," "equity," and "inclusion" have the same meaning as in RCW 28A.415.443.

[ 2021 c 197 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.415.443.